src/fst/morphology/stems/particles.lexd
LEXICON Particles
a
aj
ajwi'
e
anaqwan
anajwan
at
a'
chalen
chan
chankeb'
chaq
chik
e
eb'
ex
ib'
jo'
jo'kan
junq'e
kab'ej
kab'ejer
kax
kaajer
ko'ej
ko'ejer
laj
len
ma
mayalok
mayer
ma'laq
maajarab'
maajaruj
maaji'
maajo'q'e
maalay
maamin
maawa'
mixk
moko
ta
na
najter
num
oxej
oxejer
pe'
raj
reetal
rub'elaj
ta
tana
taxaq
toj
tojaq
toja'
usan
usaq
wachik
wi'
xaq
yalaq
yo
wi'chik

PATTERN Complete_Particles
Particles [<Part>:]
